Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The fourth Wednesday in February of each year is designated as
Hypertrophic Cardiomyopathy Awareness Day.
SECTION 2. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4104 (HB 4104-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 13, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4104 (HB 4104-INTRO) Page 2